Utah statutes.
4-8-4.   Department functions, powers, and duties.

The department has and shall exercise the following functions, powers, and duties, in addition to those specified in Chapter 1, Short Title and General Provisions:

(1)  general supervision over the marketing, sale, trade, advertising, storage, and transportation practices, used in buying and selling products of agriculture in Utah;

(2)  conduct and publish surveys and statistical analyses with its own resources or with the resources of others through contract, regarding the cost of production for products of agriculture, including transportation, processing, storage, advertising, and marketing costs; regarding market locations, demands, and prices for such products; and regarding market forecasts;

(3)  assist and encourage producers of products of agriculture in controlling current and prospective production and market deliveries in order to stabilize product prices at prices which assure reasonable profits for producers and at the same time ensure adequate market supplies; and

(4)  actively solicit input from the public and from interested groups or associations, through public hearings or otherwise, to assist in making fair determinations with respect to the production, marketing, and consumption of products of agriculture.

